Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
SEWAGE HOLDING TANKS

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2004, p. 357,

§

1, not codified by the General Assembly, designated the existing provisions of Chapter 15 as Article 1, effective July 1, 2004.

12-15-1. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Sewage Holding Tank Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-15-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2.)

12-15-2. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that there is a need for sewage holding tanks to accommodate the sewage from flush toilets which serve the needs of employees at construction sites during the temporary period of construction and the needs of the public at special events, and that such sewage holding tanks should be regulated to ensure that they are maintained in a clean, sanitary, and functional condition for the protection of human health, safety, and welfare. Where such sewage holding tanks are utilized, their construction, maintenance, and operation shall meet the standards of this article and all health and safety regulations applicable thereto.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a period was substituted for a colon at the end of the second sentence.

12-15-3. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Construction period" means the period of time during which a valid construction permit is in effect for a construction site.

"Construction site" means the property designated in a valid construction permit issued by the local government having jurisdiction of construction.

"Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.

"Sewage" means human excreta, all water carried wastes, and liquid waste, including gray water or similar waste by-products.

"Sewage holding tank" means a portable receptacle used on a temporary basis for containing sewage from flush toilets not connected to a public sewer system or an approved on-site sewage management system.

"Sewage holding tank system" means a closed system including the plumbing fixtures and connections to the sewage holding tanks.

"Special event" means any activity attracting more than 50 persons which is sponsored, organized, promoted, managed, or financed by any person, group, partnership, organization, corporation, business, or government entity where individuals congregate to participate in or observe an activity in outdoor or portable enclosed or semienclosed structures for more than two consecutive hours.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was inserted following "business" in paragraph (7).

12-15-4. When sewage holding tanks may be utilized.

Sewage holding tanks may be utilized for construction trailers only at a construction site during the construction period, and at the site of any special event during the period of the special event and for 48 hours before and after the special event.
Sewage holding tanks shall not be used as an approved method of sewage disposal in obtaining an occupancy permit or permanent power for any structure.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1.)

12-15-5. Sewage holding tank specifications; removal of sewage from tanks; disposal of sewage; manifests.

Sewage holding tanks shall be maintained in a clean, sanitary, and functional condition and shall be constructed of impervious materials. Sewage holding tanks shall be watertight and capable of containing the sewage in a sanitary manner and shall be adequate in size to contain the sewage from the flush toilets being served by the tank and shall be serviced at least once per week while in use so that the tank will not be filled to more than one-half of its volume between regularly scheduled service. The prime contractor at a construction site or sponsor at a special event must monitor sewage holding tank capacity and ensure that the tank volume will not exceed one-half of the tank capacity at any time.

Any defective or inadequate holding tank shall be repaired immediately or removed from service.

Removal of sewage from sewage holding tanks shall be accomplished in a clean and sanitary manner by means of a vacuum hose and shall be received into a leakproof tank truck, approved and licensed for such service by the local health department for transport. Any sewage spilled, leaked, discharged, or otherwise released or removed from a sewage holding tank to any location other than a leakproof tank truck shall be deemed a violation of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act," and such violation shall be punishable under the provisions of said Article 2.

The sewage from sewage holding tanks carried by tank trucks shall be disposed only at a sewage treatment plant which is owned and operated by a city or county government and which holds a valid permit from the division. Such disposal shall occur only with the permission of the city or county government which owns the sewage treatment plant. Any disposal of sewage from a tank truck at any location other than the place inside the property boundaries of a sewage treatment plant designated by the plant's owner shall be deemed to be a violation of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title. Such violation shall be punishable under the provisions of said Article 2.

The sewage holding tank provider shall be responsible for maintaining a manifest system to ensure that all sewage pumped from a holding tank is disposed of in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section. A responsible employee of the city or county sewage treatment plant which receives the sewage must sign a manifest for each load of sewage received, and the sewage holding tank provider must make the manifests available on each tank truck at any time for inspection by the division or any county board of health.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was deleted following "owner" in the third sentence of subsection (d).

12-15-6. Responsibility for ensuring compliance with article.

The prime contractor named in the construction permit or the sponsor of a special event and the sewage holding tank service provider shall be responsible for ensuring that the appropriate provisions of this article are complied with.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2.)

12-15-7. Enforcement of compliance with article.

The department and respective county boards of health and their duly authorized agents are authorized to enforce compliance with this article and rules and regulations promulgated and adopted pursuant to this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2.)

12-15-8. Violations.

Any person violating the provisions of this article shall be deemed to be in violation of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title.
Any such violation shall be punishable under the provisions of said Article 2.

(Code 1981, §

12-15-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 357, § 2.)